test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-natam_gt-norm.yaml
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmak # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmat
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmâyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   ê-nitonâmâyahk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmâyêk

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO:    ê-nitonawit # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO:    ê-nitonâsk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO:   ê-nitonâkoyahk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyêk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO:    ê-nitonawicik # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO:    ê-nitonâskik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyâhkik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO:   ê-nitonâkoyahkok
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyêkok

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    ê-nitonâmit # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    ê-nitonâmisk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   ê-nitonâkoyahk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyêk

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonawât # THIRD DIR
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonawâcik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-nitonawâyit
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmât
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmâcik

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    ê-nitonâkot # THIRD INV
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    ê-nitonâkocik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-nitonâkoyit

## FUTURE CONDITIONAL ##
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO:    nitonawiyani # LOCAL DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO:    nitonawiyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO:    nitonawiyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO:    nitonawiyêko

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO:    nitonâtâni # LOCAL INVERSE
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO:    nitonâtâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO:    nitonâtâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO:    nitonâtako


     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO:    nitonawaki # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO:    nitonawaci
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO:   [nitonawâyahko, nitonawâyahki]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâyêko
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO:    nitonawakwâwi # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO:    nitonawatwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâyâhkwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO:   nitonawâyahkwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâyêkwâwi

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâmaki # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâmaci
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâmâyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   [nitonâmâyahko, nitonâmâyahki]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâmâyêko

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO:    nitonawici # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO:    nitonâski
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO:    nitonâkoyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO:   [nitonâkoyahko, nitonâkoyahki]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO:    nitonâkoyêko
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO:    nitonawitwâwi # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO:    nitonâskwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO:    nitonâkoyâhkwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO:   nitonâkoyahkwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO:    nitonâkoyêkwâwi

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    nitonâmici # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    nitonâmiski
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    nitonâkoyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   [nitonâkoyahko, nitonâkoyahki]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    nitonâkoyêko

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nitonawâci # THIRD DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nitonawâtwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: nitonawâyici
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    nitonâmâci
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    nitonâmâtwâwi

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    nitonâkoci # THIRD INV
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    nitonâkotwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nitonâkoyici

## IMPERATIVE ##
#LOCAL IMMEDIATE#
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:    nitonawin
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:    nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:    nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:    nitonawik
#LOCAL DELAYED#
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO:    nitonawîhkan
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO:    nitonawîhkâhk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO:    nitonawîhkâhk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO:    nitonawîhkêk

#MIXED IMMEDIATE#
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:    nitonaw # Obj. Sg.
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:    nitonawihk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâtân

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:    nitonawik # Obj. Pl.
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:    nitonawihkok
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâtânik
#MIXED DELAYED#
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO:    nitonawâhkan # Obj. Sg.
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâhkêk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâhkahk

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO:    nitonawâhkanik # Obj. Pl.
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâhkêkok
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâhkahkok


###PRT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kikî-nitonawin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kikî-nitonawinân
     PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kikî-nitonawinân
     PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kikî-nitonawinâwâw

     PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kikî-nitonâtin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kikî-nitonâtinân
     PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kikî-nitonâtinân
     PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kikî-nitonâtinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-kî-nitonawiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-kî-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-kî-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-kî-nitonawiyêk

     PV/e+PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-kî-nitonâtân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-kî-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-kî-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+PV/ki+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-kî-nitonâtakok


###FUT+INT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kiwî-nitonawin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kiwî-nitonawinân
     PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kiwî-nitonawinân
     PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kiwî-nitonawinâwâw

     PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kiwî-nitonâtin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kiwî-nitonâtinân
     PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kiwî-nitonâtinân
     PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kiwî-nitonâtinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-wî-nitonawiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-wî-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-wî-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-wî-nitonawiyêk

     PV/e+PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wî-nitonâtân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wî-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wî-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+PV/wi+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wî-nitonâtakok


###FUT+DEF###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/ka+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kika-nitonawin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ka+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kika-nitonawinân
     PV/ka+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kika-nitonawinân
     PV/ka+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kika-nitonawinâwâw

     PV/ka+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kika-nitonâtin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ka+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kika-nitonâtinân
     PV/ka+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kika-nitonâtinân
     PV/ka+nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kika-nitonâtinâwâw
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wîcihêw - ok : # VTA1 (VTA1 AEW) 

###PRS###
## INDEPENDENT ##
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kiwîcihin # LOCAL DIR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kiwîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kiwîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kiwîcihinâwâw

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kiwîcihitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kiwîcihitinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kiwîcihitinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kiwîcihitinâwâw


     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO:    niwîcihâw # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO:    kiwîcihâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO:    niwîcihânân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO:    kiwîcihânaw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO:    kiwîcihâwâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO:    niwîcihâwak # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO:    kiwîcihâwak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:    niwîcihânânak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO:    kiwîcihânawak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO:    kiwîcihâwâwak

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    niwîcihimâwa # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimâwa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    niwîcihimânâna
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimânawa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimâwâwa

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO:    niwîcihik # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO:    kiwîcihik
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1PlO:    niwîcihikonân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO:    kiwîcihikonaw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO:    kiwîcihikowâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO:    [niwîcihikowak, niwîcihikwak] # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO:    [kiwîcihikowak, kiwîcihikwak]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO:    niwîcihikonânak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO:    kiwîcihikonawak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO:    kiwîcihikowâwak

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    niwîcihimâwa # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimâwa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    niwîcihimânâna
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimânawa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimâwâwa

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihêw # THIRD DIR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihêwak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:    wîcihêyiwa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    wîcihimêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    wîcihimêwak

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    [wîcihik, wîcihikow] # THIRD INV
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    [wîcihikowak, wîcihikwak]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihikoyiwa


## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-wîcihiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-wîcihiyâhk
     PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-wîcihiyâhk
     PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-wîcihiyêk

     PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wîcihitân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wîcihitâhk
     PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wîcihitâhk
     PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wîcihitakok
